New York, session 2025-2026, A4198.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (b) and (c) of subdivision 2 of section 6811-a 2 of the education law, as amended by section 9 of part D of chapter 60 of 3 the laws of 2014, are amended and a new paragraph (d) is added to read 4 as follows: 5 (b) an N. D. C. number, symbol, number, letters, words or marking 6 identifying such drug or combination of drugs; [and] 7 (c) whenever the distributor of the prescription drug product does not 8 also manufacture the product the names and places of business of both 9 shall appear on the label in words clearly distinguishing each[.]; and 10 (d) the unique number associated with the original manufactured lot of 11 the item being prescribed. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08423-01-5